Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,118
Costs; use in establishing licensure fees.

Costs associated with implementation of the Outpatient Surgical Procedures Data Act may be considered by the department in determining variable costs for purposes of establishing licensure fees under section 71-434 and shall not require an appropriation of General Funds.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 8.